Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 19

Human Trafficking — Prevention and Law Enforcement

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

12-19-101. State Task Force for the Prevention of Human Trafficking.

The Attorney General may establish a State Task Force for the Prevention of Human Trafficking.

The task force shall address all aspects of human trafficking, including sex trafficking and labor trafficking of both United States citizens and foreign nationals.

If established, representatives on the task force shall be appointed by the Attorney General and may include representatives from:

The office of the Attorney General;

The office of the Governor;

The Department of Labor and Licensing;

The Department of Health;

The Department of Human Services;

The Arkansas Association of Chiefs of Police;

The Arkansas Sheriffs' Association;

The Division of Arkansas State Police;

The Arkansas Prosecuting Attorneys Association;

Local law enforcement; and

Nongovernmental organizations such as:

Those specializing in the problems of human trafficking;

Those representing diverse communities disproportionally affected by human trafficking;

Agencies devoted to child services and runaway services; and

Academic researchers dedicated to the subject of human trafficking.

If the task force is created by the Attorney General, he or she may invite federal agencies that operate in the state to be members of the task force, including without limitation:

The Federal Bureau of Investigation;

United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement; and

The United States Department of Labor.

If the task force is created by the Attorney General, the task force shall:

Develop a state plan;

Coordinate the implementation of the state plan;

Coordinate the collection and sharing of human trafficking data among government agencies in a manner that ensures that the privacy of victims of human trafficking is protected and that the data collection shall respect the privacy of victims of human trafficking;

Coordinate the sharing of information between agencies to detect individuals and groups engaged in human trafficking;

Explore the establishment of state policies for time limits for the issuance of law enforcement agency endorsements as described in 8 C.F.R. § 214.11(f)(1), as it existed on January 1, 2013;

Establish policies to enable state government to work with nongovernmental organizations and other elements of the private sector to prevent human trafficking and provide assistance to victims of human trafficking who are United States citizens or foreign nationals;

Evaluate various approaches used by state and local governments to increase public awareness of human trafficking, including trafficking of United States citizens and foreign national victims;

Develop curriculum and train law enforcement agencies, prosecutors, public defenders, judges, and others involved in the criminal and juvenile justice systems on:

Offenses under the Arkansas Human Trafficking Act of 2013, § 5-18-101 et seq.;

Methods used in identifying victims of human trafficking who are United States citizens or foreign nationals, including preliminary interview techniques and appropriate questioning methods;

Methods for prosecuting human traffickers;

Methods of increasing effective collaboration with nongovernmental organizations and other relevant social service organizations in the course of investigating and prosecuting a human trafficking case;

Methods for protecting the rights of victims of human trafficking, taking into account the need to consider human rights and special needs of women and minors;

The necessity of treating victims of human trafficking as crime victims rather than criminals; and

Methods for promoting the safety of victims of human trafficking; and

Submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2013, No. 133, § 1, provided: “Title. This act shall be cited as the ‘Arkansas Human Trafficking Act of 2013’.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Labor and Licensing” for “Department of Labor” in (b)(3); and substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (b)(8).

ALR.

Validity, Construction, and Application of State Statutes Proscribing Human Trafficking. 101 A.L.R.6th 417 (2015).

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Mary Ward, Note: Arkansas’s Human Trafficking Laws: Steps in the Right Direction or a False Sense of Accomplishment?, 37 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 133 (2014).

“If you or someone you know is being forced to engage in any activity and cannot leave — whether it is commercial sex, housework, farm work, or any other activity — call the National Human Trafficking Resource Center Hotline at 1-888-373-7888 to access help and services. Victims of human trafficking are protected under United States and Arkansas state law.

The Hotline is:

• Available 24 hours a day, 7 days a week

• Toll-free

• Operated by a non-profit, non-governmental organization

• Anonymous and confidential

• Accessible in 170 languages

• Able to provide help, referral to services, training, and general information”.

Print the poster from any of the internet websites in subsection (c) of this section; or

Request that the poster be mailed for the cost of printing and first-class postage.

The owner or operator shall post the sign in compliance with subsection (a) of this section.

If the regulatory agency that licenses or permits an establishment under this section finds that the establishment has failed to post the information required under this section, the owner or operator shall receive:

For a first violation, a warning; and

For a second or subsequent violation, a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

The violation of or noncompliance with this section, and each day's continuance thereof, shall constitute a separate and distinct violation.

The civil fines in subsection (e) of this section do not apply to establishments that are owned or operated by the State of Arkansas.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (c)(3).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Labor and Licensing” for “Department of Labor” in (c)(2).

ALR.

Validity, Construction, and Application of State Statutes Proscribing Human Trafficking. 101 A.L.R.6th 417 (2015).

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Mary Ward, Note: Arkansas’s Human Trafficking Laws: Steps in the Right Direction or a False Sense of Accomplishment?, 37 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 133 (2014).

History.

Acts 2013, No. 132, § 6; 2013, No. 133, § 6; 2019, No. 910 §
5403.

12-19-102. Posting information about the National Human Trafficking Resource Center Hotline.

The following establishments shall post in a conspicuous place near the entrance of the establishment, or where posters and notices of this type customarily are posted, a poster described in subsection (b) of this section measuring at least eight and one-half inches by eleven inches (8½" x 11") in size:

A hotel, motel, or other establishment that has been cited as a public nuisance for prostitution under §20-27-401;

A strip club or other sexually oriented business;

A private club that has a liquor permit for on-premises consumption and does not hold itself out to be a food service establishment;

An airport;

A train station that serves passengers;

A bus station; and

A privately owned and operated facility that provides food, fuel, shower or other sanitary facilities, and overnight parking.

(1)The poster shall read:

The poster shall be printed in English, Spanish, and any other language mandated by the Voting Rights Act of 1965, 42 U.S.C. § 1973, as it existed on January 1, 2013, in the county where the poster will be posted.

The poster shall be available on the websites of all of the following:

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Board where documents associated with obtaining a liquor license or alcoholic beverage license are customarily located;

The Department of Labor and Licensing; and

The Arkansas Department of Transportation.

(1)To obtain a copy of the poster required to be posted under this section, the owners or operators of an establishment required to post the notice under this section shall:

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1157, § 5; 2017, No. 707, § 20; 2019, No. 910, §
5404.

12-19-103. Development of a state protocol for assistance.

The Department of Human Services shall develop a state protocol for assisting victims of human trafficking with applying for federal and state benefits and services to which they may be entitled.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1157, § 5.

12-19-104. Law enforcement agency nonimmigrant visa certification.

Each law enforcement agency shall adopt a policy for the completion and signing of T and U nonimmigrant visa certification forms for human trafficking victims.

The policy adopted under subsection (a) of this section shall include a requirement that a law enforcement official shall complete the certification no later than thirty (30) days after receipt of the request for certification.

Cross References. Private college or university law enforcement officers, §12-9-211.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1138, § 3.

12-19-105. Training and educational materials on human trafficking.

The Department of Education and the Department of Human Services shall collaborate on providing awareness and training materials to local school districts on human trafficking that include without limitation strategies for the prevention of the trafficking of children.

The training materials required under subsection (a) of this section shall describe local, state, and national resources to which a student, a parent, a counselor, or school personnel may consult for information on human trafficking that includes without limitation strategies for the prevention of the trafficking of children.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 937, § 1.